Louisiana, session 2026, HB1183.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1667.1.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1667.1.1. Extra compensation for certain law enforcement officers
A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, in addition to
the compensation now paid to any probation or parole officer who is a commissioned
law enforcement officer and a full-time employee of the Department of Public Safety
and Corrections, and who is paid a salary of not less than eight hundred dollars per
month, and who has completed and passed a P.O.S.T.-certified training program as
provided in R.S. 40:2405, and who has completed or who hereafter completes one
year of service shall be paid by the state extra compensation in the amount of six
hundred dollars per month.
B. Prior service as a full-time deputy sheriff or law enforcement officer with
a municipality, tribe, or policy agency of the state or political subdivision shall be
included in computing the period of service required for the payment of extra
compensation under the provisions of this Section.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1380 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1183
Section 2. This Act shall take effect and become operative if and when the proposed
amendment of Article X of the Constitution of Louisiana contained in the Act which
originated as House Bill No. 581 of this 2026 Regular Session of the Legislature is adopted
at a statewide election and becomes effective.